Utah statutes.
31A-11-105.   Application of Title 16 -- Incorporation of domestic motor
clubs.
Domestic corporations acting or applying to act as a motor club under this
chapter are subject to Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business
Corporation Act, if for profit, or Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised
Nonprofit Corporation Act, if not for profit.  The Division of Corporations
and Commercial Code in the Department of Commerce issues certificates of
incorporation for domestic corporations acting as motor clubs under this
chapter, unless they are Chapter 5 corporations.  This section does not negate
the requirement of a motor club obtaining a certificate of authority from the
commissioner. Section 16-6a-301 does not apply to bar a not-for-profit motor
club from organizing under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah Revised Nonprofit
Corporation Act.
